District of Columbia statutes.
33-202.02

Repealed

Amendment to certificate of limited partnership.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 202, 34 DCR 6856
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-422.